dictsource/bg_rules
// translation rules for Bulgarian
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Letter groups:
// C  consonants
// Y  iotated vowels and soft sign
.L01 е ѐ и ѝ  // 'i' and 'e' vowels
.L02 р л м н    //sonorant consonants
.L03 б в г д з  дз ж дж //sounded consonants
.L04 п ф к т с ц ш щ ч х  //silent consonants

.group а
        а          a
     @) а (_S1     a
     @) ак (_      'ak
     @) ар (_      'ar
     @) ач (_      'atS

     @) алище (_   'aliSte
     @) ание (_    'anie
     @) авище (_   'aviSte
     @) аж (_      'aZ
     @) алня (_    'aln;a
     @) ария (_    aria
     @) ация (_    'atsia
     @) ателство (_ 'atelstvo
     @) ален (_    'alen
     @) ански (_   'anski
     @) ателен (_  'atelen


.group б
        б          b
        б (Y       b;

.group в
        в          v
        в (Y       v;

.group г
        г          g
        г (Y       g;

.group д
        д          d
        д (Y       d;
        дж         dZ
        дз         dz
        дз (Y      dz|;


.group е
        е          e
     @) ение (_    'enie
     @) ент (_     'ent

     @) евен (_    'even
     @) ебен (_    'eben
     @) ейски (_   'ejski
     @) еен (_     'een


.group ж
        ж          Z

.group з
        з          z
        з (Y       z;


.group и
        и          i
        и (_N      i:
     @) ител (_    'itel
     @) ист (_     'ist

     @) илище (_   'iliSte
     @) икав (_    'ikav
     @) ит (_      'it
     @) ив (_      'iv
     @) изъм (_    'iz@m
    от) и (я_      'i
     к) и (ня_     'i
     @) идба (_    'itba
     @) ивен (_    'iven
     @) илен (_    'ilen
     @) ински (_   'inski
     @) ителен (_  'itelen
     @) ически (_  'itSeski
     @) има (_     'ima


.group й
        й          j

.group к
        к          k
        к (Y       k;
     @) ко (_S2    ko

.group л
        л          L
        л (L01     l         // ле  ли
        л (Y       l
        л (ьL01    l^

.group м
        м          m
        м (Y       m;

.group н
        н          n
        н (Y       n^
        нн         n:

.group о
        о          o

     @) овище (_   'oviSte
        ова (т_    ov'a
        ови (т_    ov'i      //??
     @) овен (_    'oven
     @) ок (_      'ok
     @) овник (_   'ovnik
     @) ориум (_   'orium
        озен (_    'ozen


.group п
        п          p
        п (Y       p;

.group р
        р          r
        р (Y       r;

.group с
        с          s
        с (Y       s;

.group т
        т          t
        т (Y       t;
        тт         t:
     @) та (_S2    ta
     @) те (_S2    te

.group у
        у          u

.group ф
        ф          f
        ф (Y       f;

.group х
        х          x
        х (Y       C
        х (и       C

.group ц
        ц          ts
        ц (Y       ts|;


.group ч
        ч          tS
     @) чо (_      =tSo


.group ш
        ш          S


.group щ
        щ          St
        щ (Y       St;


.group ъ
        ъ          @
     @) ът (_S2    @t


.group ь
        ь          j
     C) ь 


.group ю
        ю          ju
     C) ю          u


.group я
        я          ja
     C) я          a
     @) я (_S1q    ja
    @C) я (_S1q    a
     @) ят (_S2q   jat
    @C) ят (_S2q   at
     @) яние (_    'janie

.group
        ̀          =         // combining grave accent
        $          d'oLar
        ѐ          ''e
        ѝ          ''i
